Arkansas, session 2025, HB1479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 18-12-108(b), concerning who may execute
and record a scrivener's affidavit, is amended to add additional subdivisions
to read as follows:
(5) Licensed engineer or surveyor who prepared the original
survey, plat, replat, lot split, boundary line adjustment, or other
instrument that affects or is related to the title to the real property; or
(6) Notary public who witnessed the execution of an original
instrument and executed an acknowledgement to the original instrument that
contains an error.

/s/Warren


*ZRC009*
03-12-2025 14:02:56 ZRC009